Ohio, session 136, HB970.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4909.183 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4909.183. (A) As used in this section, "public utility" means an entity defined in section 4905.03 of the Revised Code that is a public utility under section 4905.02 of the Revised Code. (B) For a period of twelve months beginning on the effective date of this section, the public utilities commission shall not approve any application, rate, or rider filed by any public utility that would result in the increase in rates or rider collections. This moratorium applies only to filings for requests that have not received final approval by the public utilities commission prior to the effective date of this section. Approved rates and riders in effect on or before the effective date of this section shall remain in effect and may be charged and collected. (C) The moratorium imposed under this section does not apply to any rate or rider imposed or collected as required by federal law. Section 2. This act is hereby declared to be an emergency measure necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. The reason for such necessity is to immediately shelter Ohio consumers from additional rate increases. Ratepayers need both temporary and long-term relief as Ohio faces an ongoing affordability crisis. Therefore, this act shall go into immediate effect.